Connecticut, session 2026, HB05387.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 31-40z of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Benefits" means health insurance benefits, retirement benefits,
fringe benefits, paid leave and any other compensation other than
wages to be offered with a position;
[(1)] (2) "Employer" means any individual, corporation, limited
liability company, firm, partnership, voluntary association, joint stock
association, the state and any political subdivision thereof and any
public corporation within the state using the services of one or more
employees for pay;
[(2)] (3) "Employee" means any individual employed or permitted to
work by an employer;
HB5387 / File No. 249 1

HB5387 File No. 249
[(3)] (4) "Wages" means compensation for labor or services rendered
by an employee, whether the amount is determined on a time, task,
piece, commission or other basis of calculation; and
[(4)] (5) "Wage range" means the range of wages an employer
[anticipates relying on when setting wages] sets in good faith for a
position, and may include reference to any applicable pay scale,
previously determined range of wages for the position, actual range of
wages for those employees currently holding [comparable] equivalent
positions or the employer's budgeted amount for the position.
(b) No employer shall:
(1) Prohibit an employee from disclosing or discussing the amount of
[his or her] such employee's wages or the wages of another employee of
such employer that have been disclosed voluntarily by such other
employee;
(2) Prohibit an employee from inquiring about the wages of another
employee of such employer;
(3) Require an employee to sign a waiver or other document that
denies the employee [his or her] such employee's right to disclose or
discuss the amount of [his or her] such employee's wages or the wages
of another employee of such employer that have been disclosed
voluntarily by such other employee;
(4) Require an employee to sign a waiver or other document that
denies the employee [his or her] such employee's right to inquire about
the wages of another employee of such employer;
(5) Inquire or direct a third party to inquire about a prospective
employee's wage and salary history unless a prospective employee has
voluntarily disclosed such information, except that this subdivision
shall not apply to any actions taken by an employer, employment
agency or employee or agent thereof pursuant to any federal or state law
that specifically authorizes the disclosure or verification of salary
history for employment purposes. Nothing in this section shall prohibit
HB5387 / File No. 249 2

HB5387 File No. 249
an employer from inquiring about other elements of a prospective
employee's compensation structure, as long as such employer does not
inquire about the value of the elements of such compensation structure;
(6) Discharge, discipline, discriminate against, retaliate against or
otherwise penalize any employee who discloses or discusses the
amount of [his or her] such employee's wages or the wages of another
employee of such employer that have been disclosed voluntarily by
such other employee;
(7) Discharge, discipline, discriminate against, retaliate against or
otherwise penalize any employee who inquires about the wages of
another employee of such employer;
(8) Fail or refuse to provide an applicant for employment the wage
range for a position for which the applicant is applying and a general
description of the benefits to be offered with such position, if such
position has not been made available to an applicant pursuant to an
internal or public job advertisement, upon the earliest of (A) the
applicant's request, or (B) prior to [or at the time the applicant is made
an offer of compensation; or] any discussion of compensation with the
applicant or an offer of compensation to the applicant;
(9) Fail or refuse to provide an employee the wage range for the
employee's position and a general description of the benefits to be
offered with such position upon (A) the hiring of the employee, (B) a
change in the employee's position with the employer, or (C) the
employee's first request for a wage range;
(10) Fail or refuse to disclose in an internal or public job
advertisement for a position the wages or wage range for such position
and a general description of the benefits to be offered with such position;
(11) Fail or refuse to annually provide an employee with the current
wage range for such employee's position and a general description of
the benefits currently provided with such position; or
(12) Retaliate or discriminate against an applicant or employee,
HB5387 / File No. 249 3

HB5387 File No. 249
including, but not limited to, refusing to interview or hire a prospective
employee, refusing to promote an employee or terminating an
employee for exercising such applicant's or employee's rights under this
section.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require any employer
[or employee to disclose the amount of wages paid to any employee] to
post a job advertisement if such employer utilizes an alternative method
of hiring or recruiting for a position.
(d) An action to redress a violation of subsection (b) of this section
may be maintained in any court of competent jurisdiction by any one or
more employees or prospective employees. An employer who violates
subsection (b) of this section may be found liable for (1) statutory
damages of not less than one thousand dollars and not more than ten
thousand dollars or compensatory damages, whichever is greater, (2)
attorney's fees and costs, (3) punitive damages, and (4) such legal and
equitable relief as the court deems just and proper.
(e) [No action shall be brought for any] An action for a violation of
subsection (b) of this section [except within] may be brought not later
than two years after such violation.
(f) The provisions of this section shall apply to any position in which
the duties of such position will be performed within the state or in which
the duties for such position will be performed outside of the state but
requires the employee performing such duties to report to a supervisor,
office or other work site located within the state.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 31-40z
LAB Joint Favorable
HB5387 / File No. 249 4

HB5387 File No. 249
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill expands certain disclosures to require employers to include
a position’s wage or wage range, and a general description of the
position’s benefits in its public and internal job advertisements. This
does not result in any fiscal impact to the state or municipalities.
The bill allows employees or prospective employees to bring cases to
the court if they believe the employer is in violation of the provisions of
this bill. This does not result in any fiscal impact to the state or
municipalities. The court system disposes of over 250,000 cases annually
and the number of cases is not anticipated to be great enough to need
additional resources.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5387 / File No. 249 5

HB5387 File No. 249
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5387
AN ACT CONCERNING DISCLOSURE OF WAGE RANGES AND
BENEFITS ON PUBLIC AND INTERNAL JOB ADVERTISEMENTS.